Louisiana, session 2026, HB270.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:115(F)(2)(f) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§115. Registration by mail
* * *
F.
* * *
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply in the
case of the following:
* * *
(f) A person who is incarcerated in an institution inside or outside the parish
in which he is qualified to vote and who requests to vote absentee by mail pursuant
to R.S. 18:1303(G).
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1032 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 270